Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-346
Board of supervisors; power to borrow money; purpose; limitation.

Before funds can be secured by the levy of a tax or the sale of bonds, the board of supervisors of such drainage district shall have power to borrow money and pledge the credit of the district for the payment of the same, with interest, in any sum not to exceed five thousand dollars, to pay the necessary cost and expenses of the organization and incorporation of the district and all other legitimate charges and expenses incurred by the board and its officers and employees in performing the services and duties required of them by sections 31-301 to 31-369.

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 10, p. 523;

R.S.1913, § 1841;

C.S.1922, § 1788;

C.S.1929, § 31-445;

R.S.1943, § 31-346.